Washington statutes.
RCW 39.86.170

Fees.

A fee schedule shall be established by rule by the agency to assist in support of bond allocation activities. Fees shall reflect costs actually incurred or expected to be incurred by the agency in its bond allocation and bond users clearinghouse activities.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 6 s 10; 1987 c 297 s 8.]

NOTES:

Short title—2010 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 43.180.160.